Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-219.03
Board of Barber Examiners; set fees; manner; annual report.

The Board of Barber Examiners shall set the fees at a level sufficient to provide for all expenses and salaries of the board authorized in section 71-222 and in such a manner that unnecessary surpluses are avoided. The board shall annually file a report with the Attorney General and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst stating the amount of the fees set by the board. Such report shall be submitted on or before July 1 of each year. The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1975, LB 66, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 102;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 58.